Hawaii statutes.
§440-12 Licenses, participants. (a)
Any individual may apply to the commission for a license to act as a physician,
referee, judge, matchmaker, manager, timekeeper, second, or professional boxer
to participate, either directly or indirectly, in any boxing contest. The
application shall be in writing, addressed to the commission, and signed by the
applicant. The application shall contain a recital of facts as may be
specified by the commission in order for it to determine whether or not the
applicant possesses the necessary physical, mental, and moral qualifications to
entitle the applicant to a license. The commission shall adopt rules for
licensure in accordance with chapter 91.

(b) In addition, the applicant for a referee,
judge, manager, or second license shall take and pass a written examination as
provided by the commission. The commission may exempt an applicant for a
manager or second license from taking the examination, if the applicant holds a
valid manager or second license in another jurisdiction with comparable boxing
regulations.

(c) Any license to act as a physician,
referee, judge, matchmaker, manager, timekeeper, second, or professional boxer
may be suspended or revoked, or the person otherwise disciplined by the
commission after a contested case hearing held in accordance with chapter 91.
[L 1929, c 216, §13; RL 1935, §7000; RL 1945, §7561; am L 1949, c 264, §7; RL
1955, §165-12; HRS §440-12; am L 1976, c 15, §1; am L 1983, c 241, §10; am L
1986, c 135, §9; am L 1997, c 40, §6; am L 2004, c 135, §11]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next